District of Columbia statutes.
38-915

Official expenses.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia, the Chairman and members of the Council of the District of Columbia, the Chief Judge of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, the Chief Judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, the Executive Officer of the District of Columbia Court System, the Superintendent of Schools, the City Administrator, the Director of the District of Columbia Public Library, and the Chief Executive Officer of the University of the District of Columbia are authorized to provide for the expenditure, within the limits of specified annual appropriation, of funds for appropriate purposes related to their official capacity as they may respectively deem necessary. Their determination thereof shall be final and conclusive, and their certificate shall be sufficient voucher for the expenditure of appropriations made pursuant to this section.

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 509, Pub. L. 93-140, § 26
Sept. 23, 1978, D.C. Law 2-111, § 2, 25 DCR 1462
Oct. 24, 1981, D.C. Law 4-46, § 2, 28 DCR 4271
Jan. 26, 1982, D.C. Law 4-61, § 7, 28 DCR 4771
1981 Ed., § 31-2215.
1973 Ed., § 31-1122.